Utah statutes.
63M-1-405.   Qualifying local contributions.

(1)  An area may be designated as an enterprise zone only if the county applicant or municipal applicant agrees to make a qualifying local contribution.

(2)  The qualifying local contribution may vary depending on available resources, and may include such elements as:

(a)  simplified procedures for obtaining permits;

(b)  dedication of available government grants;

(c)  dedication of training funds;

(d)  waiver of business license fees;

(e)  infrastructure improvements;

(f)  private contributions;

(g)  utility rate concessions;

(h)  small business incubator programs; or

(i)  management assistance programs.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

